Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 1
GENERAL ASSISTANCE

30-17-101. Legislative declaration.

It is the intent of the general assembly in the enactment of this part 1 to enable each county to provide a means of temporary general assistance to poor persons who reside in the county or to transients. Such temporary general assistance is necessarily restricted by the limited ability of county government to make appropriations therefor.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1451, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 428, § 5, effective July 1.

30-17-102. Counties may provide temporary general assistance to the poor.

Each county may provide temporary general assistance to the poor who reside in the county or to transients. If such provision is made, each county may provide eligible recipients with such relief as, in the judgment of the board of county commissioners, is needed.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1451, § 1, effective May 22.

30-17-103. Standards and guidelines.

If a temporary general assistance program is undertaken, the board of county commissioners of each county, by ordinance, shall establish standards and guidelines for determining who is eligible to receive temporary general assistance, what types of assistance shall be offered, what amounts of assistance shall be paid, and for what periods of time such assistance shall be offered.

In adopting and promulgating such standards and guidelines, the board of county commissioners may establish requirements of residency for a specified minimum period, not to exceed six months, and may also set different residency requirements for different types of relief.

The board of county commissioners, in the standards and guidelines adopted pursuant to this article, may require that any applicant for temporary general assistance search for employment and accept employment that is offered and also enroll with the divisions of employment and training and unemployment insurance in order to be eligible to receive temporary general assistance. The requirements, however, do not apply to an applicant who is unable to work due to a temporary disability. The board may require verification of a disability by a medical examination. The requirements to search for employment do not apply to persons who are sixty-five years of age and older.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1451, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (HB 12-1120), ch. 27, p. 112, § 30, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

The effective date for amendments to subsection (3) by House Bill 12-1120 (chapter 27, Session Laws of Colorado 2012) was changed from August 8, 2012, to June 1, 2012 by House Bill 12S-1002 (First Extraordinary Session, chapter 2, p. 2432, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.)

30-17-104. Burial expenses.

Each county shall also provide for the decent burial of any person who dies within the county who does not leave sufficient funds for such burial and whose family is either financially unable to provide for such burial or cannot be contacted within a reasonable time.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1452, § 1, effective May 22.

30-17-105. Temporary general assistance account.

Each board of county commissioners, upon its determination to undertake a temporary general assistance program, shall establish a temporary general assistance account for the purpose of providing money for the temporary general assistance program in the county; and each board shall appropriate money for such account for such purpose.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1452, § 1, effective May 22.

30-17-106. Establishment of poorhouse. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1452, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 82:

(4) amended, p. 428, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section repealed, p. 914, § 23, effective August 6.

30-17-107. Reimbursement to county.

If at any time the recipient of temporary general assistance acquires funds or other property, he shall be answerable to the county for the expense of the relief furnished. If the recipient fails to reimburse the county upon demand, the county may assert its claim for reimbursement in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1452, § 1, effective May 22.

30-17-108. Temporary general assistance payments limited to appropriation.

In no event shall payment of temporary general assistance benefits exceed, in the aggregate, the appropriation made by the board of county commissioners for the temporary general assistance account.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1452, § 1, effective May 22.